Utah statutes.
77-22a-1.   Administrative subpoenas -- Controlled substances investigations
-- Procedures -- Witness fees.
(1) (a)  The administrative subpoena process of this chapter may be used only
to obtain third party information under circumstances where it is clear that
the subpoenaed information is not subject to a claim of protection under the
Fourth, Fifth, or Sixth Amendment, United States Constitution, or a similar
claim under Article I, Sec.  12 and Sec.  14, Utah Constitution.
(b)  A party subpoenaed under this chapter shall be advised by the subpoena
that he has a right to challenge the subpoena by motion to quash filed in the
appropriate district court named in the subpoena before compliance is
required.
(2)  In any investigation relating to his functions under this chapter
regarding controlled substances, the attorney general or a deputy or assistant
attorney general the county attorney or a deputy county attorney, or the
district attorney or deputy district attorney may subpoena witnesses, compel
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or require the production of any
records including books, papers, documents, and other tangible things that
constitute or contain evidence found by the attorney general or a deputy or
assistant attorney general or the county attorney or district attorney as
provided under Sections 17-18-1 and 17-18-1.7 or his deputy  to be relevant or
material to the investigation.  The attendance of witnesses or the production
of records may be required from any place within the state.
(3)  Witnesses subpoenaed under this section shall be paid the same fees and
mileage costs as witnesses in the state district courts.
(4)  If the attorney general or a deputy or assistant attorney general or the
county attorney or district attorney or his deputy determine that disclosure
of the existence of an administrative subpoena or of the information sought or
of the existence of the investigation under which it is issued would pose a
threat of harm to a person or otherwise impede the investigation, the subpoena
shall contain language on its face directing that the witness not disclose to
any person the existence or service of the subpoena, the information being
sought, or the existence of an investigation.
